DIAGNOSTICS -

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

DI-79

DI6XN-01

DTC

C 1246/ 46

Circuit

Master Cylinder Pressure Sensor

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

C1246/ 46

Either of the following 1., 2., 3., 4. or 5. is detected:

1. At the vehicle speed of 7 km/h (4 mph) or more, ECU
terminal PMC voltage becomes more than 0.86 V and
the condition that 0.01 V or less does not change con-
tinues for 30 sec.

2. Interference occurs to ECU terminal PMC 7 times or
more for 5 sec.

3.ECUterminal STPis OFF, and the condition that termi-
nal PMC voltage becomes morethan 0.86V orlessthan
0.3 V continues for 5 sec. or more.

4. The condition that ECU terminal IG1 voltage is 9.5 V to
17.0 V, and terminal VCM voltage other than the range
from 4.4 V to 5.6 V continues for 1.2 sec. or more.

5. The condition that ECU terminal VCM voltage is 4.4 V to

5.6 V, and terminal PMC voltage other than the range
from 0.14 V to 4.85 V continues for 1.2 sec. or more.

» Master cylinder pressure sensor
» Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the master cylinder pressure sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid
relay and prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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DI-80 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Startthe inspectionfrom step 1in case of using the hand —heldtesterand startfrom step 2in case of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Check output value ofthe master cylinder pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthatthe brake fluid pressure value of the master cylinder pressure sensor displayed on the hand -held
tester is changing when depressing the brake pedal.
OK:
Brake fluid pressure value must be changing.

0K> Go to step 4.
NG \

2 [ Check master cylinder pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@) Install LSPV gauge to the front caliper bleeder plug por-
= tion, and bleed LSPV gauge.
,_* BMC SST09709 -29018
(+) (b) Removeaircleanerinletand battery clamp cover.
o CHECK:
0 = |§ —E2 ) Startthe engine and depressthe brake pedal, then check the
7%%\ N relation between the fluid pressure and voltage of PMC and E2
o = rossos| terminals ofthe master cylinder pressure sensor with connector
still connected.
OK:
Front brake caliper fluid pressure Voltage
0kPa (0Kgficm ,0psi) 0.37 - 0.63V
5,883kPa (60kgficm 853 psi) 1.57 - 1.83V
11,768 kPa (120 kgf/cm d, 1,706 psi) 2.77 - 3.08V
HINT:
Voltage of betweenterminalsVCMand E2: 4.7 -5.3V

NG> Replace master cylinder pressure sensor.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-81
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between master cyl-
inder pressure sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

4 [ Check whether or not the ECU terminal STP input voltage is changed when the
stop light switch is turned on and off.

DI-82).

NO> Check the stop light switch circuit (See page

YES

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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